Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,101
Contested cases; chief medical officer; duties.

If a chief medical officer is appointed pursuant to section 81-3115, he or she shall perform the duties of the director for decisions in contested cases under the Uniform Credentialing Act other than contested cases under sections 38-1,119 to 38-1,123.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 78;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-155.01;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 308;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 101.